Utah statutes.
76-1-301.   Offenses for which prosecution may be commenced at any time.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Aggravating offense" means any offense incident to which a homicide was committed as described in Subsection 76-5-202(1)(d) or (e) or Subsection 76-5-202(2).

(b)  "Predicate offense" means an offense described in Section 76-5-203(1) if a person other than a party as defined in Section 76-2-202 was killed in the course of the commission, attempted commission, or immediate flight from the commission or attempted commission of the offense.

(2)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, prosecution for the following offenses may be commenced at any time:

(a)  capital felony;

(b)  aggravated murder;

(c)  murder;

(d)  manslaughter;

(e)  child abuse homicide;

(f)  aggravated kidnapping;

(g)  child kidnapping;

(h)  rape;

(i)  rape of a child;

(j)  object rape;

(k)  object rape of a child;

(l)  forcible sodomy;

(m)  sodomy on a child;

(n)  sexual abuse of a child;

(o)  aggravated sexual abuse of a child;

(p)  aggravated sexual assault; or

(q)  any predicate offense to a murder or aggravating offense to an aggravated murder.



Amended by Chapter 24, 2011 General Session

